Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-3403
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, the definitions found in sections 81-3403.01 to 81-3427 shall be used.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 35.
November 14, 2020